Maryland, session 2026, HB1637.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 7–301 through 7–310 of Article – General Provisions of the Annotated Code
of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 7–302 through 7–311, respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – General Provisions
7–301.
THE LONG–TAILED SALAMANDER (EURYCEA LONGICAUDA) IS THE STATE
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1637*

HOUSE BILL 1637
AMPHIBIAN.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.